Utah statutes.
26-49-204.   No effect on credentialing and privileging.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Credentialing" means obtaining, verifying, and assessing the
qualifications of a health practitioner to provide treatment, care, or
services.
(b)  "Privileging" means the authorizing by an appropriate authority of a
health practitioner to provide specific treatment, care, or services at a
health facility subject to limits based on factors that include license,
education, training, experience, competence, health status, and specialized
skill.
(2)  This chapter does not affect credentialing or privileging standards of a
health facility, and does not preclude a health facility from waiving or
modifying those standards while an emergency declaration is in effect.
